District of Columbia statutes.
1-181

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Emancipation Day Parade” means the parade, and associated activities, including the provision of food, snacks, entertainment, and non-alcoholic beverages to the general public, participants, and District government employees, held to celebrate and commemorate District of Columbia Emancipation Day.

(2)

“Fund” means the Emancipation Day Fund.

Mar. 16, 2005, D.C. Law 15-240, § 2, 51 DCR 11225
Feb. 27, 2008, D.C. Law 17-110, § 2(a), 55 DCR 223
D.C. Law 17-110, in par. (1), substituted “activities, including the provision of food, snacks, entertainment, and non-alcoholic beverages to the general public, participants, and District government employees, held to celebrate” for “activities, held to celebrate”.
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2 of District of Columbia Emancipation Day Fund Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-125, May 2, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 4400).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2 of Emancipation Day Fund Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-9, June 5, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 4873).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2 of District of Columbia Emancipation Day Parade and Fund Temporary Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-138, April 22, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 4922).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of District of Columbia Emancipation Day Fund Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-263, January 30, 2002, 49 DCR 1443).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Emancipation Day Fund Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-17, February 25, 2003, 50 DCR 1948).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of District of Columbia Emancipation Day Parade and Fund Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-343, January 29, 2004, 51 DCR 1827).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of District of Columbia Emancipation Day Parade and Fund Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-660, December 29, 2004, 52 DCR 797).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of District of Columbia Emancipation Day Parade and Fund Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-61, March 17, 2005, 52 DCR 3197).